Massachusetts, session 194th, S1538.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 115 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 18. (a) For the purposes of this act, the following terms shall have the following
meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Council”, the veteran breakthrough treatments and suicide prevention advisory council.
“Eligible entity”, a licensed hospital, research institution, agency, individual, medical
institution or other legal entity that: (i) is qualified under the laws of the commonwealth to
furnish medical care or services to patients; and (ii) meets the requirements of the secretary of
health and human services, as set forth in section 2.
of 4

“Eligible therapy”, treatment for post-traumatic stress disorder, major depressive disorder
or treatment-resistant depression with breakthrough therapy designation by the United States
Food and Drug Administration.
“First responder”, a member of: (i) a police department; (ii) a fire department; (iii) the
state police; or (iv) an emergency reserve unit of a volunteer fire department or fire protection
district trained to administer first aid; provided, however, that a first responder shall not include
police officers, firefighters or other persons engaged in police and fire work whose duties are
primarily clerical or administrative.
“Program”, the veteran breakthrough treatments program established in section 2.
“Veteran”, a veteran, as defined in clause Forty-third of section 7 of chapter 4 of the
General Laws, who is a resident of the commonwealth.
(b) (1) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the executive office of
health and human services, in consultation with the executive office of veterans’ services, shall
establish the veteran breakthrough treatments program to promote, incentivize and support the
development and deployment of eligible therapies among veterans and first responders. The
secretary of health and human services may establish additional requirements and guidelines
regarding eligible therapies.
(2) The program shall fund clinical research, treatment and provider training aimed at
advancing or deploying breakthrough therapies for veterans and first responders.
(c) (1) There is hereby established the veteran breakthrough treatments and suicide
prevention advisory council. The council shall advise the executive office of health and human
of 4

services and the executive office of veterans’ services on the regulations and clinical
infrastructure necessary to support clinical access to and training for the deployment of eligible
therapies for veteran suicide prevention.
(2) The council shall advise the executive office on:
(i) the award of grants for eligible therapy treatment through the program;
(ii) the necessary education, training, licensing and credentialing of providers;
(iii) patient safety and harm reduction;
(iv) costs, insurance reimbursement and strategies to safely increase affordable access to
care, including the use of group therapy;
(v) standards for treatment facilities;
(vi) relevant federal regulations and guidelines that commonwealth agencies may
consider adopting;
(vii) assisting with the development of public awareness and education campaigns related
to veteran suicides;
(viii) additional funding needed for subsidized patient access and provider and therapist
training;
(ix) developing criteria and standards for the award of grants and fellowships;
(x) developing and providing oversight regarding mechanisms for the dissemination of
treatment and training data; and
of 4

(xi) developing provisions to ensure justice, equity, diversity and inclusion are considered
in the administration of grants and recommendations made to the executive office.
(3) The council shall consist of 7 members: (i) 3 members appointed by the governor; (ii)
2 members appointed by the president of the senate; and (iii) 2 members appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives. Each appointer shall appoint at least one veteran. The
council shall also include members with expertise in eligible therapy research, clinical mental
health treatment, public health, access to mental and behavioral healthcare in underserved
communities, veteran mental and behavioral healthcare and harm reduction.
of 4